english1-lexc.txt
					!See section 4.2; lexc stands for Lexicon Compiler

Multichar_Symbols	!Don't include CONTINUATION CLASSES or names of a lexicon
					+N +Sg +Pl 
					+V +3P +Past +PastPart +PresPart
			
LEXICON Root 		!There are many lexicons here; only 1 can be called Root
		Noun;		!Root is meant to suggest the root of a word
		Verb;		!Lexicon names are not followed by semicolon
					!See page 242 for other categories to possibly include in Root
					!Root doesn't have to be initial state; see page 241

LEXICON Noun
cat   Ninf;			!Each entry in a lexicon is a FORM and CONTINUATION CLASS
city  Ninf;
<f o x>   Ninf;		!Sample regex between angle brackets and exploded
panic Ninf;
try   Ninf;
watch Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf
+N+Sg:0 #;			!A CONTINUATION CLASS may be a terminal symbol
+N+Pl:^s #;			!This is a 2-level transducer as shown by the colon

LEXICON Verb
beg   Vinf;
fox   Vinf;
make  Vinf;
panic Vinf;
try   Vinf;
watch Vinf;

LEXICON Vinf
+V:0 #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s #;
+V+Past:^ed #;
+V+PastPart:^ed #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;

END !optional end statement

anything after it is ignored
